Vermont, session 2025-2026, H172.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 700 is added to read:
§ 700. Common Interest Community Resource Center
(a)(1) The Office of the Secretary of State shall establish and maintain the
Common Interest Community Resource Center to provide information to the
public about Vermont’s common interest ownership communities.
VT LEG #379889 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.172
2025 Page 2 of 2
(2) The Secretary of State may contract with any nonprofit organization
for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this section.
(b) The Common Interest Community Resource Center shall:
(1) assist the public in understanding and navigating issues related to
common interest communities;
(2) provide information, materials, and guides for the creation and
administration of common interest communities, including matters related to
organization, governance, budgeting, conflict resolution, transparency, and
rights and responsibilities for homeowners and associations; and
(3) ensure the information required by this subsection is made available
online in a user-friendly format and at no cost to the public.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379889 v.1